Maine, session 132, LD775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 2 MRSA §1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 488, §1, is further amended by
enacting after the 3rd paragraph a new paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a measure providing for an
increase in the annual salary of the Governor enacted by the Legislature with an effective
date after the first Wednesday of January 2027 must include provisions requiring the salary
increase to be submitted to the legal voters of the State for approval or rejection at the next
general election held in the month of November following the enactment of the measure.
For the purposes of this section, "general election" has the same meaning as in Title 21-A,
section 1, subsection 19.
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §2, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 446, §1, is further amended
to read:
Each member of the Senate and House of Representatives, beginning with the first
Wednesday of December 2000 until the day before the first Wednesday of December 2024,
is entitled to $10,815 in the first year and $7,725 in the 2nd year of each biennium, except
that if a Legislator who is a recipient of retirement benefits from the federal Social Security
Administration files a written request with the Executive Director of the Legislative
Council within one week after the biennium commences, the Legislator is entitled to $9,270
in each year of the biennium. Beginning with the first Wednesday of December 2024, each
member of the Senate and House of Representatives is entitled to $25,000 in the first year
and $20,000 in the 2nd year of each biennium, except that if a Legislator who is a recipient
of retirement benefits from the federal Social Security Administration files a written
request with the Executive Director of the Legislative Council within one week after the
biennium commences, the Legislator is entitled to $22,500 in each year of the biennium.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a measure providing for a salary
increase for members of the Senate and House of Representatives enacted by the
Legislature with an effective date after the first Wednesday of December 2024, excluding
the cost-of-living adjustment provided in this section, must include provisions requiring
the salary increase to be submitted to the legal voters of the State for approval or rejection
at the next general election held in the month of November following the enactment of the
measure. For the purposes of this section, "general election" has the same meaning as in
Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 19. Each member of the Senate and the House of
Representatives must receive a cost-of-living adjustment in annual legislative salary,
except that the percentage increase may not exceed 5% in any year, and except that the
percentage increase may not exceed 3% beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30,
2014. Beginning December 1, 2001, the salary for each legislative session must be adjusted
each December 1st by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for the most
recently concluded fiscal year; except that a member of the Senate or the House of
Representatives may not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in annual legislative salary for
the Second Regular Session of the 124th Legislature, and except that a member of the
Senate or the House of Representatives may not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in
annual legislative salary for the Second Regular Session of the 125th Legislature and the
First Regular Session and the Second Regular Session of the 126th Legislature, and any
percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2011,
June 30, 2012 and June 30, 2013 may not be applied to the base salary. In addition, each
Page 1 - 132LR1050(01)

416 Legislator is entitled to be paid mileage for travel at each legislative session to and from
427 that Legislator's place of abode at a rate of 55¢ per mile or the federal standard mileage
438 rate, whichever is lower, the mileage to be determined by the most reasonable direct route,
449 except that Legislators may be reimbursed for tolls paid for travel on the Maine Turnpike
550 as long as they have a receipt for payment of the tolls, such tolls to be reimbursed when
561 Legislators use the Maine Turnpike in traveling to and from sessions of the Legislature or
572 in performance of duly authorized committee assignments. Each Legislator is entitled to
583 mileage on the first day of the session, and those amounts of salary and expenses at such
594 times as the Legislature may determine during the session, and the balance at the end of the
1505 session.